District of Columbia statutes.
33-435

Repealed

Dissolution — Effect on partner’s existing liability; discharge of liability.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 644, Pub. L. 87-709, § 36
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1973 Ed., § 41-335.
1981 Ed., § 41-135.